Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5012.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DEPARTMENT OF EMPLOYMENT AND ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT.new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, unless otherwise specified, "commissioner" means the commissioner of employment and economic development. new text end new text begin (b) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner for financial assistance to qualified businesses as provided in this section. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (c) The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of transportation, must establish a grant program to provide financial assistance to qualified businesses adversely affected by the Department of Transportation's redesign and construction project along marked Trunk Highway 61, also known as 7th Avenue, through the city of Two Harbors. new text end new text begin (d) A qualified business must: new text end new text begin (1) employ no more than 100 full-time equivalent or part-time employees; new text end new text begin (2) be located within the 55616 zip code area; and new text end new text begin (3) experience impairment of road access, parking, or visibility as a result of the project. new text end new text begin (e) The commissioner may establish requirements in addition to the qualifications under paragraph (d) as necessary to efficiently and equitably provide financial assistance under this section. new text end new text begin (f) Financial assistance provided under this section may be used for employee payroll expenses, operating expenses, or facilities expenses and must not be used for bonuses; new equipment, furniture, or capital improvements; or construction or expansion. new text end new text begin (g) Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 16B.98, subdivision 14, of the appropriation in paragraph (b), the commissioner may use up to five percent for administrative costs. new text end new text begin (h) By January 15, 2029, the commissioner must submit a report on the grants awarded under this section to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over (1) employment and economic development and (2) transportation finance and policy. At a minimum, the report must include a complete list of grants awarded, including business names and addresses, types of businesses, and the amount of each award. new text end